Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.005

State military department to administer emergency management program—Local organizations authorized to change name.

The department shall administer the comprehensive emergency management program of the state of Washington as provided for in this chapter. All local organizations, organized and performing emergency management functions pursuant to RCW 38.52.070, may change their name and be called the . . . . . . department/division of emergency management.

[ 1995 c 391 s 1; 1986 c 266 s 22; 1984 c 38 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 6 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 391: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 391 s 18.]

Transfer of powers and duties of department of emergency management and office of archaeology and historic preservation—Construction of statutory references: "The department of emergency management and the office of archaeology and historic preservation are hereby abolished and their powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the department of community development. All references to the director of emergency management or the department of emergency management and the office of archaeology and historic preservation in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or department of community development." [ 1986 c 266 s 1.]

Severability—1986 c 266: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 266 s 138.]